Tennessee, session 114, SB2530.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 3, Chapter 1, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) Upon the request of an immediate family member of a deceased member or
former member of the general assembly, the governor and the speakers of the senate
and house of representatives shall allow the deceased member or former member to lie
in state at the state capitol building for a specified period of time not to exceed the entire
period of time during one (1) day that the state capitol building is open to the public. If
the deceased member or former member does not have an immediate family member,
the governor and the speakers may authorize the deceased member or former member
to lie in state in accordance with this subsection (a) upon their own initiative.
(b) As used in this section, "immediate family member" means a spouse, parent,
sibling, or child.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2530
010653
- 1 -